Utah statutes.
16-10a-1325.   Payment.
(1)  Except as provided in Section 16-10a-1327, upon the later of the
effective date of the corporate action creating dissenters' rights under
Section 16-10a-1302, and receipt by the corporation of each payment demand
pursuant to Section 16-10a-1323, the corporation shall pay the amount the
corporation estimates to be the fair value of the dissenter's shares, plus
interest to each dissenter who has complied with Section 16-10a-1323, and who
meets the requirements of Section 16-10a-1321, and who has not yet received
payment.
(2)  Each payment made pursuant to Subsection (1) shall be accompanied by:
(a) (i) (A)  the corporation's balance sheet as of the end of its most recent
fiscal year, or if not available, a fiscal year ending not more than 16 months
before the date of payment;
(B)  an income statement for that year;
(C)  a statement of changes in shareholders' equity for that year and a
statement of cash flow for that year, if the corporation customarily provides
such statements to shareholders; and
(D)  the latest available interim financial statements, if any;
(ii)  the balance sheet and statements referred to in Subsection (2)(a)(i)
shall be audited if the corporation customarily provides audited financial
statements to shareholders;
(b)  a statement of the corporation's estimate of the fair value of the shares
and the amount of interest payable with respect to the shares;
(c)  a statement of the dissenter's right to demand payment under Section
16-10a-1328; and
(d)  a copy of this part.
